Washington statutes.
RCW 26.14.070

Qualification and selection of arbitrator.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, unless waived in a record by the parties, an arbitrator must be:

(a) An attorney in good standing admitted to practice in this state, with a minimum of five years of experience practicing family law, which must make up no less than 50 percent of the attorney's practice, or a former judicial officer, including a former pro tem judicial officer; and

(b) Trained in child development, child and juvenile mental health issues, identifying domestic violence and child abuse, and trauma-informed practices. This training must consist of at least seven hours every year. Former judicial officers are not required to receive additional training for one year following the end of their judicial service.

(2) The identification of an arbitrator, arbitration organization, or method of selection of the arbitrator in the arbitration agreement controls.

(3) If an arbitrator is unable or unwilling to act or if the agreed-on method of selecting an arbitrator fails, on motion of a party, the court shall select an arbitrator.

[ 2023 c 61 s 8.]